public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/ved.aff
FLAG UTF-8
# vèrbi '-er
# themeT1 + er/cE
# themeT4 + rò/cJL
SFX c Y 585
SFX c ò à/JLNR ò
SFX c ò àe/R ò
SFX c ò è/JL ò
SFX c ò èmi/K ò
SFX c ò é/P ò
SFX c ò émoi/M ò
SFX c ò ésimo/L ò
SFX c ò ésimoi/M ò
SFX c ò éu/Q ò
SFX c ò í/P ò
SFX c ò ía/JLNR ò
SFX c ò íami/K ò
SFX c ò íatu/O ò
SFX c ò íeƚo/B ò
SFX c ò íe/JLR ò
SFX c ò íelo/B ò
SFX c ò íemi/K ò
SFX c ò ímoi/M ò
SFX c ò íu/Q ò
SFX c ò òmi/K ò
SFX c ò aƚo/B ò
SFX c ò alo/B ò
SFX c ò ami/K ò
SFX c ò atu/O ò
SFX c ò ave/RS ò
SFX c ò emo/L ò
SFX c ò en/L ò
SFX c ò eni/M ò
SFX c ò ense ò
SFX c ò esi/P ò
SFX c ò esiu/Q ò
SFX c ò ié/P ò
SFX c ò iéu/Q ò
SFX c ò imo/L ò
SFX c ò ion/L [^cijɉñ]ò
SFX c ò on/L [cijɉñ]ò
SFX c ò ioni/M [^cijɉñ]ò
SFX c ò oni/M [cijɉñ]ò
SFX c ò ionse [^cijɉñ]ò
SFX c ò onse [cijɉñ]ò
SFX c ò isen/L ò
SFX c ò iseni/M ò
SFX c ò isense ò
SFX c ò isié/P ò
SFX c ò isiéu/Q ò
SFX c ò ision/L ò
SFX c ò isioni/M ò
SFX c ò isionse ò
SFX c ò ison/L ò
SFX c ò isoni/M ò
SFX c ò isonse ò
SFX c erò é/FP ò
SFX c erò éa/JLPR ò
SFX c erò éami/K ò
SFX c erò éau/Q ò
SFX c erò éeƚo/B ò
SFX c erò ée/JL ò
SFX c erò éelo/B ò
SFX c erò éemi/K ò
SFX c erò éi/NP ò
SFX c erò éimo/L ò
SFX c erò éimoi/M ò
SFX c erò éitu/O ò
SFX c erò émoi/M ò
SFX c erò éndome/G ò
SFX c erò éo/JL ò
SFX c erò éomi/K ò
SFX c erò ésimo ò
SFX c erò éu/Q ò
SFX c erò évami/K ò
SFX c erò évau/Q ò
SFX c erò éveƚo/B ò
SFX c erò évelo/B ò
SFX c erò évemi/K ò
SFX c erò évimo/L ò
SFX c erò évimoi/M ò
SFX c erò évitu/O ò
SFX c erò évomi/K ò
SFX c erò í/FP ò
SFX c erò ímoi/M ò
SFX c erò íu/Q ò
SFX c erò ú ò
SFX c erò úo/B ò
SFX c erò ié/P ò
SFX c erò iede/P ò
SFX c erò iege/P ò
SFX c erò iéu/Q ò
SFX c erò ime/H ò
SFX c erò imo/L ò
SFX c erò isen/L ò
SFX c erò isene ò
SFX c erò iseni/M ò
SFX c erò isense ò
SFX c erò isié/P ò
SFX c erò isiede/P ò
SFX c erò isiege/P ò
SFX c erò ision/L ò
SFX c erò isione ò
SFX c erò isioni/M ò
SFX c erò isionse ò
SFX c erò ison/L ò
SFX c erò isone ò
SFX c erò isoni/M ò
SFX c erò isonse ò
SFX c erò iven/L ò
SFX c erò iveni/M ò
SFX c erò ivense ò
SFX c erò ivié/P ò
SFX c erò iviéu/Q ò
SFX c erò ivion/L ò
SFX c erò ivioni/M ò
SFX c erò ivionse ò
SFX c erò ivon/L ò
SFX c erò ivoni/M ò
SFX c erò ivonse ò
SFX c erò on/L ò
SFX c erò one ò
SFX c erò oni/M ò
SFX c erò onse ò
SFX c erò udo/B ò
SFX c er a er
SFX c er ar/E er
SFX c er are er
SFX c er arme/G er
SFX c er e/IJLR er
SFX c er emi/K er
SFX c er er/E er
SFX c er ere er
SFX c er erme/G er
SFX c er i/FN er
SFX c er ime/H er
SFX c er itu/O er
SFX c er o/JL er
SFX c er omi/K er
SFX b r lo/B er
SFX b r ƚo/B er
SFX b r mi/K er
SFX b er ime/H er
SFX b er itu/O er
SFX b er omi/K er
SFX c rò de ò
SFX c rò ge ò
SFX c rò me/H ò
SFX c rò mo/L ò
SFX c rò n/L ò
SFX c rò ndo/E ò
SFX c rò ne ò
SFX c rò ni/M ò
SFX c rò nse ò
SFX c rò nte ò
SFX c rò se/I ò
SFX c rò si ò
SFX c rò sto/BI ò
SFX c rò va/JLPR ò
SFX c rò ve/JL ò
SFX c rò vi/NP ò
SFX c rò vo/JL ò
SFX c r ƚo/B er
SFX c r lo/B er
SFX c r r/E er
SFX c r re er
SFX c r rme/G er
SFX c èñer en/FR èñer
SFX c èñer enlo/B èñer
SFX c èñer enme/H èñer
SFX c èñer ièn/FR èñer
SFX c èñer iènlo/B èñer
SFX c èñer iènme/H èñer
SFX c éñer ien/FR èñer
SFX c éñer ienlo/B èñer
SFX c éñer ienme/H èñer
SFX c verò biè deverò
SFX c verò bié deverò
SFX c verò bi deverò
SFX c verò bia deverò
SFX c verò bie deverò
SFX c verò biede deverò
SFX c verò biege deverò
SFX c verò biemo deverò
SFX c verò bien deverò
SFX c verò biene deverò
SFX c verò bion deverò
SFX c verò bione deverò
SFX c xerò ga dixerò
SFX c xerò gi dixerò
SFX c xerò go/JL dixerò
SFX c xerò gomi/K dixerò
SFX c xerò ir/E dixerò
SFX c xerò ire dixerò
SFX c xerò rà/JLNR dixerò
SFX c xerò ràe/R dixerò
SFX c xerò rè/JL dixerò
SFX c xerò ré/P dixerò
SFX c xerò rémoi/M dixerò
SFX c xerò résimo/L dixerò
SFX c xerò résimoi/M dixerò
SFX c xerò rí/P dixerò
SFX c xerò ría/JLNR dixerò
SFX c xerò ríami/K dixerò
SFX c xerò ríatu/O dixerò
SFX c xerò ríeƚo/B dixerò
SFX c xerò ríe/JLR dixerò
SFX c xerò ríelo/B dixerò
SFX c xerò ríemi/K dixerò
SFX c xerò rímoi/M dixerò
SFX c xerò ríu/Q dixerò
SFX c xerò ròmi/K dixerò
SFX c xerò rave/RS dixerò
SFX c xerò remo/L dixerò
SFX c xerò ren/L dixerò
SFX c xerò reni/M dixerò
SFX c xerò rense dixerò
SFX c xerò resi/P dixerò
SFX c xerò resiu/Q dixerò
SFX c xerò rié/P dixerò
SFX c xerò riéu/Q dixerò
SFX c xerò rimo/L dixerò
SFX c xerò rion/L dixerò
SFX c xerò rioni/M dixerò
SFX c xerò rionse dixerò
SFX c xerò risen/L dixerò
SFX c xerò riseni/M dixerò
SFX c xerò risense dixerò
SFX c xerò risié/P dixerò
SFX c xerò risiéu/Q dixerò
SFX c xerò rision/L dixerò
SFX c xerò risioni/M dixerò
SFX c xerò risionse dixerò
SFX c xerò rison/L dixerò
SFX c xerò risoni/M dixerò
SFX c xerò risonse dixerò
SFX c xerò ron/L dixerò
SFX c xerò roni/M dixerò
SFX c xerò ronse dixerò
SFX c àer à/FR tràer
SFX c àer è/FP tràer
SFX c àer ème/H tràer
SFX c àer èu/Q tràer
SFX c àer é/FP tràer
SFX c àer émoi/M tràer
SFX c àer éu/Q tràer
SFX c àer arà/JLNR tràer
SFX c àer aràe/R tràer
SFX c àer arè/JL tràer
SFX c àer arèmi/K tràer
SFX c àer aré/P tràer
SFX c àer arémoi/M tràer
SFX c àer arí/P tràer
SFX c àer arímoi/M tràer
SFX c àer ar/E tràer
SFX c àer are tràer
SFX c àer aremo/L tràer
SFX c àer aren/L tràer
SFX c àer areni/M tràer
SFX c àer arense tràer
SFX c àer arimo/L tràer
SFX c àer emo/L tràer
SFX c àer en/L tràer
SFX c àer eni/M tràer
SFX c àer on/L tràer
SFX c àer oni/M tràer
SFX c ago à/FR trago
SFX c ago è/FP trago
SFX c ago ème/H trago
SFX c ago èu/Q trago
SFX c ago é/FP trago
SFX c ago émoi/M trago
SFX c ago éu/Q trago
SFX c er gomi/K tràer
SFX c go ràe/R trago
SFX c go résimo/L trago
SFX c go résimoi/M trago
SFX c go ría/JLNR trago
SFX c go ríami/K trago
SFX c go ríatu/O trago
SFX c go ríeƚo/B trago
SFX c go ríe/JLR trago
SFX c go ríelo/B trago
SFX c go ríemi/K trago
SFX c go rave/RS trago
SFX c go rion/L trago
SFX c go rioni/M trago
SFX c go rionse trago
SFX c go risen/L trago
SFX c go riseni/M trago
SFX c go risense trago
SFX c go rision/L trago
SFX c go risioni/M trago
SFX c go risionse trago
SFX c go rison/L trago
SFX c go risoni/M trago
SFX c go risonse trago
SFX c o a trago
SFX c èser ɉèra/JLPR èser
SFX c èser ɉèrami/K èser
SFX c èser ɉèrau/Q èser
SFX c èser ɉère/JL èser
SFX c èser ɉèrelo/B èser
SFX c èser ɉèreƚo/B èser
SFX c èser ɉèremi/K èser
SFX c èser ɉèri/NP èser
SFX c èser ɉèrimo/L èser
SFX c èser ɉèrimoi/M èser
SFX c èser ɉèritu/O èser
SFX c èser ɉèro/JL èser
SFX c èser ɉèromi/K èser
SFX c èser ‘sendo èser
SFX c èser eren/L [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser ereni/M [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser erense [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser erié/P [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser eriéu/Q [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser erion/L [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser erioni/M [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser erionse [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser eriven/L [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser eriveni/M [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser erivense [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser erivié/P [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser eriviéu/Q [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser erivion/L [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser erivioni/M [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser erivionse [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser erivon/L [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser erivoni/M [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser erivonse [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser eron/L [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser eroni/M [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser eronse [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser fúsimo [^aàbcdđéèfghíjɉklƚmnñoóòprstŧuúvx]èser
SFX c èser furésimo èser
SFX c èser furese/I èser
SFX c èser furesen/L èser
SFX c èser furesene èser
SFX c èser fureseni/M èser
SFX c èser furesense èser
SFX c èser furesié/P èser
SFX c èser furesiede/P èser
SFX c èser furesiege/P èser
