public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/ved.dic
èser/cE
ónxer/cE
đonxerò/cJL
ŧénder/cE
ŧenderò/cJL
ƚúxer/cE
ɉolerò/cJL
aborerò/cJL
adónxer/cE
akàder/cE
akòrder/cE
akojerò/cJL
améter/cE
antefaŧerò/cJL
apóner/cE
apartèñer/cE
aplauderò/cJL
arenderò/cJL
arkojerò/cJL
asénter/cE
asúmer/cE
asederò/cJL
asorberò/cJL
astràer/cE
astraerò/cJL
asumerò/cJL
ateñerò/cJL
avèñer/cE
bàter/cE
barlúxer/cE
benedixerò/cJL
cèñer/cE
díxer/cE
deđónxer/cE
debàter/cE
deceñerò/cJL
deduxerò/cJL
dekorerò/cJL
demòrder/cE
depénder/cE
dependerò/cJL
deriderò/cJL
desfríxer/cE
desiderò/cJL
deskórer/cE
deskaxerò/cJL
deskonvòlxer/cE
deskovèrđer/cE
deskoverderò/cJL
deskuèrđer/cE
deskuerderò/cJL
despóner/cE
desponerò/cJL
desprovederò/cJL
destòrđer/cE
desteserò/cJL
destorxerò/cJL
destruxerò/cJL
detràer/cE
deveñerò/cJL
dexđónxer/cE
dexinprímer/cE
dexonxerò/cJL
dexvolxerò/cJL
dispóner/cE
dividerò/cJL
duxerò/cJL
eƚiderò/cJL
elíder/cE
eliderò/cJL
entenderò/cJL
eserò/cJL
espóner/cE
esponerò/cJL
estinguerò/cJL
estraxerò/cJL
evaderò/cJL
exíjer/cE
exijerò/cJL
fàser/cE
fínxer/cE
faserò/cJL
finxerò/cJL
frànđer/cE
fríđer/cE
franderò/cJL
fremerò/cJL
fuxerò/cJL
inđonxerò/cJL
inŧenderò/cJL
inɉoterò/cJL
inakorđerò/cJL
inbéver/cE
incenderò/cJL
indixerò/cJL
infoterò/cJL
infranđerò/cJL
injoterò/cJL
inkónber/cE
inkonberò/cJL
inkontèñer/cE
inkorderò/cJL
inponerò/cJL
insèrner/cE
inseguerò/cJL
insisterò/cJL
inténder/cE
intòrxer/cE
intardíxer/cE
intarsederò/cJL
intenderò/cJL
interŧederò/cJL
interséder/cE
intorđerò/cJL
intracéñer/cE
intratèñer/cE
intravéder/cE
introduxerò/cJL
invòlxer/cE
inxonxerò/cJL
jolerò/cJL
kòñer/cE
kanđerò/cJL
koñerò/cJL
kométer/cE
konéter/cE
konŧéder/cE
koncèñer/cE
kondúxer/cE
konfónder/cE
konkluderò/cJL
konpónder/cE
konpiaxerò/cJL
konprenderò/cJL
konséder/cE
konstrénder/cE
konstrenxerò/cJL
kontòrder/cE
kontorderò/cJL
kontradixerò/cJL
kontravèñer/cE
konvèñer/cE
konvíver/cE
konvinserò/cJL
korèxer/cE
korexerò/cJL
kostrénder/cE
kostrenxerò/cJL
koverđerò/cJL
kréder/cE
kuèrđer/cE
kuerderò/cJL
lèder/cE
lederò/cJL
mòɉer/cE
mòlxer/cE
mónder/cE
maledíxer/cE
malnàser/cE
mancéñer/cE
manometerò/cJL
meterò/cJL
mojerò/cJL
monđerò/cJL
moverò/cJL
noxerò/cJL
ofénder/cE
olderò/cJL
onderò/cJL
otèñer/cE
pèrder/cE
pòrxer/cE
parinténder/cE
parméter/cE
parsuàder/cE
parveñerò/cJL
penxerò/cJL
perkórer/cE
persèguer/cE
pervèñer/cE
piànđer/cE
piòver/cE
piaxerò/cJL
porxerò/cJL
prénder/cE
prededúxer/cE
preintenderò/cJL
premerò/cJL
pretenderò/cJL
prevenderò/cJL
proŧederò/cJL
promòver/cE
propóner/cE
proséder/cE
proténder/cE
protraerò/cJL
rèxer/cE
rónper/cE
raderò/cJL
ravederò/cJL
reèser/cE
reŧiderò/cJL
reƚuxerò/cJL
rebaterò/cJL
recéñer/cE
redixerò/cJL
reelèđer/cE
reelederò/cJL
refúxer/cE
refuxerò/cJL
rekonóser/cE
rekonvínŧer/cE
rekorerò/cJL
rekoverđerò/cJL
rekréder/cE
rekuxerò/cJL
relúxer/cE
reluxerò/cJL
removerò/cJL
renpiànđer/cE
renpianderò/cJL
repeterò/cJL
reprenderò/cJL
reséver/cE
reseverò/cJL
resolverò/cJL
respénđer/cE
respenđerò/cJL
resplenderò/cJL
restrénxer/cE
retèñer/cE
retòrder/cE
retorđerò/cJL
retràxer/cE
retroŧederò/cJL
revéder/cE
reveñerò/cJL
revolxerò/cJL
rexisterò/cJL
riderò/cJL
rinvèñer/cE
romañerò/cJL
sèrver/cE
sénxer/cE
scanxerò/cJL
seguerò/cJL
sernerò/cJL
sfrànđer/cE
sfríder/cE
sfranxerò/cJL
skàder/cE
skòrxer/cE
skaderò/cJL
skonéter/cE
skoneterò/cJL
skonvòlxer/cE
skorderò/cJL
skovèrđer/cE
skoverderò/cJL
skuèrđer/cE
skuerderò/cJL
sobóɉer/cE
sodónxer/cE
sokonberò/cJL
sorađonxerò/cJL
soraesponerò/cJL
soraskriverò/cJL
soraviverò/cJL
soriderò/cJL
soscèñer/cE
sospenderò/cJL
sotinténder/cE
sotopóner/cE
sotràer/cE
soveñerò/cJL
soxónxer/cE
spànder/cE
spénxer/cE
sparxerò/cJL
splénder/cE
stòrđer/cE
storderò/cJL
strénxer/cE
strabéver/cE
straboɉerò/cJL
strakòxer/cE
strakréder/cE
strapónxer/cE
stravederò/cJL
strenxerò/cJL
sucéder/cE
susèguer/cE
tèmer/cE
ténxer/cE
tòser/cE
tenderò/cJL
torderò/cJL
tràer/cE
tracèñer/cE
traderò/cJL
traluxerò/cJL
tranxíjer/cE
traponxerò/cJL
tratéñer/cE
traxerò/cJL
vèrđer/cE
véder/cE
vínŧer/cE
veñerò/cJL
venserò/cJL
verxerò/cJL
volxerò/cJL
xaserò/cJL
xberluxerò/cJL
xgrenđerò/cJL
xlénxer/cE
xlieđerò/cJL
xonxerò/cJL
